District of Columbia statutes.
9-1107.06

Congressional consent to amendments — Articles I and XVI of Title III.

(a)

The Congress hereby consents to, and adopts and enacts for the District of Columbia, amendments to Articles I and XVI of Title III of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact as set out in § 9-1107.01, which amendments have been adopted substantially by the Commonwealth of Virginia and the State of Maryland.

(b)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized and directed to enter into and execute on behalf of the District of Columbia amendments, substantially as set forth in subsection (a) of this section, to Title III of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact with the State of Maryland and the Commonwealth of Virginia, which amendments shall become effective immediately upon execution of same.

June 4, 1976, 90 Stat. 672, Pub. L. 94-306, §§ 1, 2
The amendments referred to in subsection (a) of this section are to §§ 1 and 76 of the Compact.
1973 Ed., § 1-1431c.
1981 Ed., § 1-2436.